Wyoming, session 2026, SF0056.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 35-7-2201 through 35-7-2203 are
created to read:
ARTICLE 22
KRATOM PRODUCT REGULATION
35-7-2201. Definitions.
(a) As used in this act:
(i) "Adulterated" means the addition of a
controlled substance, a synthesized alkaloid or
semi-synthesized alkaloid into a kratom product;
(ii) "Alkaloid fraction" means a portion of a
plant or plant extract that contains primarily alkaloid
compounds;
(iii) "Controlled substance" means as defined by
W.S. 35-7-1002(a)(iv);
(iv) "Kratom leaf" means the leaf of the
mitragyna speciosa plant in fresh, dehydrated or dried
form;
1

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0056
ENROLLED ACT NO. 44, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(v) "Kratom leaf extract" means the material
extracted from a kratom leaf through the application of a
solvent consisting of water, ethanol, food-grade carbon
dioxide or another solvent allowed by federal or state law
to be used in the manufacturing of a food ingredient;
(vi) "Kratom product" means a food or dietary
supplement that consists of or contains any part of the
kratom leaf, kratom leaf extract or any kratom alkaloid,
kratom constituent or kratom metabolite. "Kratom product"
shall not include any synthesized alkaloid or
semi-synthesized alkaloid;
(vii) "Retailer" means a business of any kind at
a specific location that sells kratom products to a user or
consumer;
(viii) "Semi-synthesized alkaloid" means an
alkaloid or alkaloid derivative contained in kratom leaf
extract that has been exposed to chemicals or processes
that would confer a structural change in the alkaloids,
including but not limited to oxidation, reduction and ring
opening and closing, resulting in material that has been
chemically altered;
(ix) "Synthesized alkaloid" means an alkaloid or
alkaloid derivative of the kratom leaf that has been
created by chemical synthesis or biosynthetic means,
including fermentation, recombinant techniques,
yeast-derived techniques and enzymatic techniques.
"Synthesized alkaloid" shall not include an alkaloid or
alkaloid derivative of the kratom leaf that has been
created by traditional food preparation techniques,
including but not limited to heating or extracting;
2

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0056
ENROLLED ACT NO. 44, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(x) "This act" means W.S. 35-7-2201 through
35-7-2203.
35-7-2202. Kratom product regulation; penalties.
(a) A person is guilty of a violation of this act if
the person:
(i) Knowingly prepares, distributes, delivers,
advertises, sells or offers for sale a kratom product:
(A) That is adulterated;
(B) To a person less than twenty-one (21)
years of age;
(C) That contains a level of
7-hydromitragynine in the alkaloid fraction that is greater
than two percent (2%) of the alkaloid composition of the
kratom product;
(D) That is a confection, mimics a candy
product or is manufactured, packaged, labeled or
distributed in a way that is appealing to children,
including in the distinct shape of a human, animal or
fruit; or
(E) That is combustible or intended for
vaporization.
(ii) Knowingly prepares, distributes, delivers,
advertises, sells or offers for sale a kratom product that
does not have a label that clearly and conspicuously states
on each retail package:
3

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0056
ENROLLED ACT NO. 44, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(A) The name and address for the place of
business of the manufacturer or distributor of the kratom
product;
(B) The full list of ingredients of the
kratom product;
(C) Disclosure and advice:
(I) Against use by persons who are
less than twenty-one (21) years of age, pregnant or
breastfeeding;
(II) To consult a health care provider
prior to use;
(III) That the use of kratom products
may be habit forming;
(IV) That kratom products may interact
with certain medications, drugs and controlled substances.
(D) The following statements:
(I) "These statements have not been
evaluated by the United States food and drug
administration. This product is not intended to diagnose,
treat, cure or prevent any disease."; and
(II) "Keep out of reach of children."
(E) Directions for use that include:
(I) A recommended amount of the kratom
product per serving;
4

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0056
ENROLLED ACT NO. 44, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(II) The number of recommended
servings per package;
(III) A recommended number of servings
of the kratom product that can be safely consumed in a
twenty-four (24) hour period; and
(IV) Quantitative declarations of the
amounts of mitragynine and 7-hydroxymitragynine per serving
of the kratom product.
(iii) Displays or stores kratom products in a
retail location in a manner that would permit the products
to be accessed by persons less than twenty-one (21) years
of age; or
(iv) Manufactures, packages, distributes or
labels a kratom product or delivers a kratom product to a
person less than twenty-one (21) years of age that:
(A) Contains synthesized alkaloids or
semi-synthesized alkaloids; or
(B) Has a level of 7-hydroxymitragynine in
the alkaloid fraction that is greater than two percent (2%)
of the alkaloid composition of the product.
(b) A violation of this act is a misdemeanor
punishable by imprisonment for not more than one (1) year,
a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00),
or both.
(c) The state chemist shall, pursuant to W.S.
35-7-201 and when requested by law enforcement or the
5

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0056
ENROLLED ACT NO. 44, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
department of health, analyze kratom products to determine
whether the requirements of paragraphs (a)(i) and (iv) of
this section are being followed.
(d) Any retailer violating this act for a third or
subsequent time within a two (2) year period may be subject
to an injunction. The department of health or the district
attorney of the county in which the offense occurred may
petition the district court for an injunction to prohibit
the sale of kratom products in the establishment where the
violation occurred. If a court finds that the retailer in
the action has violated the provisions of this act for a
third or subsequent time within a two (2) year period and
may continue to violate this act, it may grant an
injunction prohibiting the retailer from selling kratom
products in the establishment where the violation occurred
for a period of not more than one hundred eighty (180)
days. For the purposes of this subsection, multiple
violations occurring before the petition for the injunction
is filed shall be deemed part of the violation for which
the injunction is sought. If the person against whom the
injunction is sought operates multiple, geographically
separate establishments, the injunction shall apply only to
the establishment where the violation occurred. The
injunction shall prohibit all sales of kratom products in
the establishment where the violation occurred, regardless
of any change in ownership or management of the
establishment that is not a bona fide, arms length
transaction while the injunction is in effect.
(e) It is an affirmative defense to a prosecution
under this act that, in the case of a sale, the retailer
who sold the kratom product was presented with, and
reasonably relied upon, an identification card which
6

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0056
ENROLLED ACT NO. 44, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
identified the person buying or receiving the kratom
product as being over twenty-one (21) years of age.
(f) Notwithstanding the provisions of this act, no
fine for a violation of subsection (a) of this section
shall be imposed for a first offense in any twenty-four
(24) month period if a retailer can show it has:
(i) Adopted and enforced a written policy
against selling kratom products to persons under the age of
twenty-one (21) years;
(ii) Informed its employees of the applicable
laws regarding the sale of kratom products to persons under
the age of twenty-one (21) years;
(iii) Required employees to verify the age of
kratom product customers by way of photographic
identification or by means of electronic transaction scan
device; and
(iv) Established and imposed disciplinary
sanctions for noncompliance.
35-7-2203. Compliance inspections.
(a) The department of health, working with local law
enforcement agencies and other local persons and
organizations at the discretion of the department, shall be
the lead agency to ensure compliance with this act.
(b) The department of health shall develop strategies
to coordinate and support local law enforcement efforts to
enforce all state statutes relating to the prohibition of
7

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0056
ENROLLED ACT NO. 44, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
the sale of kratom products to persons under twenty-one
(21) years of age.
(c) The department of health shall have discretion
to:
(i) Work with each local law enforcement agency
within the state; and
(ii) Coordinate local enforcement efforts that
appropriately reflect the needs of the community.
(d) To coordinate the enforcement of state statutes
relating to the prohibition of the sale of kratom products
to persons under twenty-one (21) years of age and to comply
with applicable federal law, the department of health shall
have authority to contract with or provide grants to local
law enforcement agencies or other local persons or entities
having the appropriate level of enforcement authority on
the local level to conduct random, unannounced inspections
at retail locations where kratom products are sold. The
local law enforcement agencies or other local persons or
entities authorized to conduct inspections shall be
permitted to use minors and persons under twenty-one (21)
years of age subject to the following:
(i) Prior to the inspection, the local law
enforcement agency or other authorized person shall obtain
the written consent of the person being used in the
inspection or if using a minor, the written consent of the
minor's parents or guardian shall be obtained prior to the
minor participating in an inspection. The written consent
required under this paragraph shall include a notification
that testimony in a subsequent court proceeding may be
required;
8

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0056
ENROLLED ACT NO. 44, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(ii) Any person under twenty-one (21) years of
age participating in an inspection shall, if questioned,
state his true age and that he is less than twenty-one (21)
years of age;
(iii) The appearance of a person under
twenty-one (21) years of age shall not be altered to make
the person appear to be twenty-one (21) years of age or
older;
(iv) Neither a minor nor the minor's parents or
guardians shall be coerced into participating in such
inspections;
(v) The person conducting the inspection shall
photograph the participant immediately before the
inspection and any photographs taken of the participant
shall be retained by the person conducting the inspection.
(e) The person conducting an inspection under this
section shall:
(i) Remain within sight or sound of the
participant attempting to make the purchase;
(ii) After an inspection is complete,
immediately inform in writing a representative or agent of
the business establishment that an inspection has been
performed and the results of the inspection;
(iii) Within two (2) days, prepare a report of
the inspection containing:
9

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0056
ENROLLED ACT NO. 44, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(A) The name of the person who supervised
the inspection;
(B) The age and date of birth of the
participant who assisted in the inspection;
(C) The name and position of the person
from whom the participant attempted to purchase kratom
products;
(D) The name and address of the
establishment inspected;
(E) The date and time of the inspection;
and
(F) The results of the inspection,
including whether the inspection resulted in the sale or
distribution of, or offering for sale, kratom products to a
person under twenty-one (21) years of age.
(iv) Immediately upon completion of the report
required under this subsection, provide a copy of the
report to a representative or agent of the business
establishment that was inspected;
(v) Request a law enforcement officer to issue a
citation for any illegal acts relating to providing kratom
products to persons under twenty-one (21) years of age
during the inspection.
Section 2. There is appropriated one hundred fifteen
thousand dollars ($115,000.00) from opioid settlement funds
distributed to the department of health or, if opioid
settlement funds are not available for that purpose, then
10

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0056
ENROLLED ACT NO. 44, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
from the general fund to the department of health for the
purpose of implementing this act. This appropriation shall
be for the period beginning July 1, 2026 and ending June
30, 2028. This appropriation shall not be transferred or
expended for any other purpose and any unexpended,
unobligated funds remaining from this appropriation shall
revert as provided by law on June 30, 2028. It is the
intent of the legislature that this appropriation be
included in the standard budget for the department of
health for the immediately succeeding fiscal biennium.
Section 3.
(a) The department of agriculture is authorized one
(1) full-time employee for the purpose of testing kratom
products as required by this act. There is appropriated one
hundred ninety-seven thousand five hundred forty dollars
($197,540.00) from opioid settlement funds distributed to
the department of health or, if opioid settlement funds are
not available for that purpose, then from the general fund
to the department of agriculture for the salary and
benefits of the position created by this subsection. This
appropriation shall be for the period beginning July 1,
2026 and ending June 30, 2028. This appropriation shall not
be transferred or expended for any other purpose and any
unexpended, unobligated funds remaining from this
appropriation shall revert as provided by law. It is the
intent of the legislature that this appropriation and this
position be included in the department of agriculture's
standard budget for the immediately succeeding fiscal
biennium.
(b) There is appropriated twenty-four thousand
dollars ($24,000.00) from opioid settlement funds
distributed to the department of health or, if opioid
11

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0056
ENROLLED ACT NO. 44, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
settlement funds are not available for that purpose, then
from the general fund to the department of agriculture to
purchase equipment necessary for the testing of kratom
products as required by this act. This appropriation shall
be for the period beginning July 1, 2026 and ending June
30, 2028. These funds shall not be transferred or expended
for any other purpose and any unexpended, unobligated funds
remaining from this appropriation shall revert as provided
by law. It is the intent of the legislature that this
appropriation be included in the department of
agriculture's standard budget for the immediately
succeeding fiscal biennium.
Section 4. The department of health and the
department of agriculture shall promulgate all rules
necessary to implement this act.
12

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0056
ENROLLED ACT NO. 44, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
Section 5.
(a) Except as provided by subsection (b) of this
section, this act is effective July 1, 2026.
(b) Sections 4 and 5 of this act are effective
immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a
bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of
the Wyoming Constitution.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
13